Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-211 Annual report. The
commissioner, as early each year as accurate preparation enables, shall prepare
and submit to the legislature a report which shall contain:

(1) The condition of all insurers authorized to do
business in this State during the preceding year.

(2) A summary of abuses and deficiencies in benefit
payments, the complaints made to the commissioner and their disposition, and
the extent of compliance and noncompliance by each insurer with the provisions
of this code.

(3) Such additional information and comments relative
to insurance activities in this State as the commissioner deems proper. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next